Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.110

Real property—Annexation to city or town.

In addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, every board of directors, if seeking to have school property annexed to a city or town and if such school property constitutes the whole of such property in the annexation petition, shall be allowed to petition therefor under RCW 35.13.125 and 35.13.130.

[ 1971 c 69 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.58.044.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 c 69: See note following RCW 35.13.125.